Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 9
FLINT RIVER DROUGHT PROTECTION

Cross references.

- State-wide water management planning, T. 12, C. 5, A. 8.

Authority to contract with Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority to implement or operate any drought protection program,

§

50-23-5

.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 2000 enactment of this article, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 29 (2000).

12-5-540. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Flint River Drought Protection Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-5-540

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Special Challenges to Water Markets in Riparian States," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 305 (2004).
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-541. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly declares its intent and the public policy of this state that the state plans, regulates, and controls the withdrawal and the use of the waters of the state under the laws of Georgia to protect the public health, safety, and welfare; and the granting of any water withdrawal permit allows the permittee to use the water solely for the stated purposes described in the permit so long as such use is consistent with the public welfare of the state and upon such conditions as the state may prescribe. This declaration of intent shall also apply to all aspects of this article.

The General Assembly finds that the use of water resources for the state for agricultural purposes is of vital importance to Georgia and southwest Georgia in particular; the protection of flows in the Flint River and its tributaries is necessary for a healthy riverine ecosystem and a healthy population of aquatic life; the use of water resources during drought conditions may interfere with public and private rights; the economic well-being of the State of Georgia is dependent on a strong and efficient agricultural industry; the wise use of water, the protection of stream flows, and the economic well-being of the state will be furthered by proper water allocation in periods of drought; and programs to augment stream flows or provide incentives to ensure that certain irrigated lands are temporarily not irrigated during severe droughts will promote the wise use of water resources, and the protection of stream flows for habitat critical for aquatic life, and the economic well-being of the state.

The General Assembly declares its intent to fund the execution of the public policy set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section by and through the authority with appropriated funds for the purposes of this article, grants, and other sources of revenue. The General Assembly intends for the total maximum balance of the unexpended drought protection funds during any fiscal year not to exceed $30 million. In the event the total balance of unexpended drought protection funds at the end of a fiscal year is less than $5 million, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the total balance of unexpended drought protection funds be replenished to at least $10 million at the earliest possible time. Appropriation of funds for inclusion in and as part of the drought protection funds shall be deemed consistent with this declaration of legislative intent.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-541

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 1/SB 213.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-542. Definitions.

As used in this article, except where otherwise specifically provided, the term:

"Acceptable Flint River basin stream flows" means the quantity of stream flows at one or more specific locations on the Flint River or its tributaries which provides for aquatic life protection and other needs as established by the director, based on municipal, agricultural, industrial, and environmental needs. Such tributaries shall not include field drainage systems, wet weather ditches, or any other water body:

In which the channel is located above the ground-water table year round;

For which runoff from precipitation is the primary source of water flow; and

For which ground water is not a source of water flow.

"Affected areas" means those specific portions of the state lying within the Flint River basin where ground-water use from the Floridan aquifer can affect stream flow or where drainage into Spring Creek, Ichawaynochaway Creek, Kinchafoonee Creek, and Muckalee Creek occurs.

(2.1) "Augmentation" means the addition of ground water from one or more aquifers underlying the affected areas into a surface water channel within the affected areas for the purpose of maintaining instream flows.

"Authority" means the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority created by Chapter 23 of Title 50.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Drought conditions" means any condition which results in a stream flow that is lower than the acceptable Flint River basin stream flows.

"Drought protection funds" means the funds held by the authority as provided in Code Section 12-5-545 for the accomplishment of the purposes of this article.

"Flint River basin" means the area of land which drains into the Flint River or its tributaries.

"Floridan aquifer" means those rocks and sediments described in United States Geological Survey Open-File Report 95-321 (1996) that are capable of yielding ground water to wells or discharging water into the Flint River or its tributaries.

"Irrigated land" means farm land which is irrigated by ground water or surface water pursuant to a water withdrawal permit issued by the director pursuant to Code Section 12-5-31 or 12-5-96.

(11.1) "Irrigation efficiency" means the percentage of the total amount of water withdrawn from a source which is beneficially used to meet crop water requirements or for other agronomic practices in accordance with applicable best management practices.

"Irrigation reduction auction" means the procedure established by subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-546 pursuant to which permittees submit offers to cease irrigation of a specified number of acres in exchange for a certain sum of money.

"Permittee" means a person holding a valid permit issued before December 1, 2000, pursuant to Code Section 12-5-31 or 12-5-96.

"Stream flow" means the quantity of water passing a given location of the Flint River or its tributaries over a given time period expressed in cubic feet per second.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-542

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 2/SB 213.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).

12-5-543. Establishment of drought abatement program; rules and regulations.

The board is authorized and directed to establish by rule and regulation for a drought abatement program for the Flint River basin in accordance with this article.

In the performance of its duties, the board shall have and may exercise the power to adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this article as the board may deem necessary. The rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Prescribing eligibility requirements for permittees of irrigation systems located in the affected areas to receive payments from the drought protection funds in accordance with Code Section 12-5-546. Such eligibility requirements shall include, without limitation, the following requirements:

The permittee must have applied to the division for a surface-water or ground-water withdrawal permit prior to December 1, 1999, and must have received a surface-water or ground-water withdrawal permit from the division prior to December 1, 2000; provided, however, that, if the director fails to act on a permit application by December 1, 2000, the time for receipt of a permit shall be extended until such time as the director makes a decision on the application. If the director's decision is to deny the permit and that decision is reversed on appeal, the date of receipt of a permit shall be deemed to be the date of the director's decision; and

The permittee must have demonstrated, in a manner to be defined by the director, actual previous irrigation by the permitted irrigation system on the same acres of land which the permittee agrees not to irrigate in a given year;

Establishing documentation requirements for nonuse of an irrigation system pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to Code Section 12-5-546 or an order issued by the director in accordance with Code Section 12-5-547;

Establishing rules and procedures to be followed in connection with the irrigation reduction auction conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-546;

Establishing rules and procedures to be followed in connection with payments to permittees from the drought protection funds pursuant to Code Section 12-5-547; or

Establishing rules and procedures for the conduct of meetings and hearings.

Any rules and regulations promulgated by the board shall be submitted by the board to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate for distribution to the members of the General Assembly at the next regular session and shall become effective upon the expiration of that session unless during that session a resolution disapproving such regulations shall have been adopted by both houses.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-543

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1.)

12-5-544. Powers of director.

In the performance of his or her duties, the director shall have and may exercise the power to:

Exercise general supervision over the enforcement of this article and all rules, regulations, and orders promulgated pursuant to this article;

Establish acceptable Flint River basin stream flows at one or more locations;

Establish those geographical areas in or adjacent to the lower Flint River basin where the division's studies indicate that ground-water use from the Floridan aquifer may affect stream flow in the Flint River or its tributaries;

Predict or declare when severe drought conditions exist or are expected to exist during a given year based on historical, mathematical, meteorological, or other scientific considerations which may be published by the director and which may be developed in consultation with the state climatologist, the state geologist, or other appropriate experts;

Establish criteria necessary to prove actual previous irrigation of lands for which a permittee seeks payment from drought protection funds;

Make investigations and inspections to ensure compliance with this article, the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this article, and any agreement or order that the division or director enters into or issues pursuant to this article;

Institute, in the name of the division, proceedings of mandamus, injunction, or other proper administrative or civil proceedings to enforce this article, the rules and regulations promulgated under this article, or any agreements or orders entered into or issued under this article;

Contract with the authority for implementing and carrying out, in whole or in part, the purposes of a drought abatement program for the Flint River basin in accordance with this article and direct the authority to make expenditures from the drought protection funds in accordance with this article;

Receive and collect all repayment penalties paid pursuant to this article and to transfer same to the authority for inclusion in the drought protection funds;

(9.1) Conduct and participate in studies related to management of the water resources in the Flint River basin;

Encourage voluntary cooperation by persons and affected groups to achieve the purposes of this article; and

Perform any and all acts and exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes and requirements of this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-544

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 3/SB 213.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).

12-5-545. Administration of fund.

The authority shall administer the drought protection funds provided to it for purposes of this article and shall make expenditures from said funds in accordance with and at the direction of the director pursuant to Code Sections 12-5-546 and 12-5-547. With the prior consent and approval of the director, the authority is authorized to expend a portion of the drought protection funds for incidental costs and expenses reasonably incurred by the authority in connection with its administration of the drought protection funds for such things as postage, office supplies, and prorated salaries and wages of personnel assigned the tasks associated with management of the drought protection funds. The authority is further authorized and directed to invest the unexpended balance of the drought protection funds in the same manner as other funds under its control. Any interest or other revenues earned on the principal of the drought protection funds shall be added to the unexpended balance of the drought protection funds and become a part thereof. Upon request of the director, the authority shall provide such accounting information to the director as may be reasonably necessary for the director to perform his or her duties and functions pursuant to this article. All moneys deposited in the drought protection funds shall be deemed to be contractually obligated and shall not lapse to the general fund.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-545

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1.)

12-5-546. Prediction of drought; irrigation reduction auction; agreement.

On or before March 1 of each year, the division may issue a prediction as to whether severe drought conditions are expected during the year. If the division predicts a severe drought during any particular year, it shall issue such prediction before March 1 of that year. Prediction of severe drought may be based on consideration of historical, mathematical, or meteorological information, including, but not limited to, stream flows, ground-water levels, and precipitation forecasts. Such prediction may also be based on scientific analyses, including, but not limited to, the Palmer Drought Severity Index administered by the National Oceanographic and Atmospheric Administration.

If severe drought conditions are predicted or otherwise declared in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section, the division may determine the total number of acres of irrigated land, serviced by irrigation systems located within one or more of the affected areas, that must not be irrigated that year in order to maintain the acceptable Flint River basin stream flows. Upon such determination, the division may conduct an irrigation reduction auction whereby a permittee of an irrigation system located within the affected areas is given an opportunity to enter into an agreement with the division, agreeing that in exchange for a certain sum of money per acre of irrigated land serviced by the irrigation system, the permittee will not irrigate those particular acres for the remainder of that calendar year. The authority shall pay the sum so agreed upon when so directed by the director from the unexpended balance of the drought protection funds. In conducting the irrigation reduction auction, the division may establish a maximum dollar amount per acre to be expended from the drought protection funds for such purposes.

An agreement entered into in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section shall be upon such terms and conditions as the division may deem necessary. The agreement shall provide for payment of the agreed upon sum within 30 days of the date of execution of the agreement by the parties. Failure of a permittee to comply with all terms of the agreement for the duration thereof shall be deemed a violation of such agreement and this article and shall be subject to enforcement by the director as provided in this article.

A permittee who enters into an agreement in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section shall not irrigate during the period covered by the agreement on those acres that the owner has agreed not to irrigate. If the permittee irrigates said acres during the period covered by the agreement, such action shall be deemed a violation of the agreement and this article and shall be subject to a penalty as determined by the director as provided in this article.

The expenditure of funds under this article as an incentive to permittees not to irrigate lands is deemed by the legislature as a valid use of state moneys to promote valid land use policies that result in the protection of the riverine environment by ensuring that such lands not be irrigated for specified periods of time. No expenditure of funds under this article shall be considered full or partial compensation for any losses, financial or otherwise, experienced due to nonirrigation; a lease or repurchase of any irrigation permit issued by the director; or an acknowledgment by the State of Georgia of a property right in any permit issued by the director.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-546

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942; Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 4/SB 213.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-546.1. Enhancement of programming and incentives; scheduling irrigation efficiencies; modifying water withdrawal permits; coordination of efforts.

The Department of Agriculture and the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall coordinate with the division in examining current practices, programs, policies, rules, and regulations to identify opportunities to enhance programming and incentives that will:

Support implementation of the agricultural water efficiency measures in water conservation or management plans prepared in accordance with Code Sections 12-5-31, 12-5-96, and 12-5-522;

Support implementation of pilot projects demonstrating the efficacy of emerging innovative irrigation technologies where appropriate and affordable;

Identify ways the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission's program for measuring agricultural uses of water as authorized under Code Section 12-5-105 can further enhance efforts to improve agricultural water use efficiency; and

Encourage a scheduled program for the voluntary retirement of unused surface-water and ground-water farm use permits in accordance with Code Sections 12-5-31 and 12-5-105.

The director may modify all active surface-water and ground-water withdrawal permits for farm use in the affected areas to require all irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to such permits to achieve irrigation efficiencies of 80 percent or greater by the year 2020. The schedule for achieving the irrigation efficiencies provided in this subsection shall be as follows:

Irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to all active permits issued after 2005 shall achieve a minimum irrigation efficiency of 80 percent by January 1, 2016;

Irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to all active permits issued from 1991 through 2005 shall achieve a minimum irrigation efficiency of 80 percent by January 1, 2018; and

Irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to all active permits issued before 1991 shall achieve a minimum irrigation efficiency of 80 percent by January 1, 2020.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Code section, the director may modify specified active surface-water and ground-water withdrawal permits for farm use in the affected areas to require all mobile irrigation systems and solid-set irrigation sprinklers operating under such permits to achieve irrigation efficiencies of 60 percent or greater by the year 2020. The schedule for achieving such efficiencies shall be as follows:

Irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to all active permits issued after 2005 shall achieve a minimum irrigation efficiency of 60 percent by January 1, 2016;

Irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to all active permits issued from 1991 through 2005 shall achieve a minimum irrigation efficiency of 60 percent by January 1, 2018; and

Irrigation systems applying water withdrawn pursuant to all active permits issued before 1991 shall achieve a minimum irrigation efficiency of 60 percent by January 1, 2020.

Notwithstanding the irrigation efficiency rates required in subsection (c) of this Code section or any other provision of this Code section to the contrary, the minimum irrigation efficiency rate for mobile irrigation systems and solid-set irrigation sprinklers applying water withdrawn pursuant to new permits shall be 60 percent.

When issuing any permit application for a new surface-water or ground-water withdrawal for farm use in the affected areas, the division shall require that the irrigation system applying water withdrawn pursuant to any such permit has an irrigation efficiency of at least 80 percent.

The division shall, in cooperation with other state and federal agencies, universities, the Georgia Water Planning and Policy Center, the Lower Flint-Ochlockonee Regional Water Council, and other appropriate entities, provide to the board for consideration for adoption in its rules requirements pertaining to methods an applicant may utilize to demonstrate that the required irrigation efficiency has been achieved. Requirements shall consider current technologies, best management practices, and the effects of soil type and topography, among other factors deemed necessary.

The division shall coordinate with any federal or state agencies offering incentive programs that support the purposes of this article, to identify opportunities to refine and target relevant programs as practicable and to assist permittees with achieving irrigation efficiency requirements.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-546.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 5/SB 213.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Management of augmented flows, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Flint River Drought Protection, Sec. 391-3-28-.16.

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).

12-5-546.2. Notification in advance of any state funded augmentation projects.

As used in this Code section, "permittee" means any person holding a valid permit issued pursuant to Code Section 12-5-31 which provides for the withdrawal of surface water from within the affected areas.

The director shall notify specified permittees downstream of any state funded augmentation project, which shall be operated for the sole purpose of maintaining the minimum stream flows sufficient to protect habitat critical for vulnerable aquatic life within the affected areas. The director may notify specified downstream permittees that, during specified periods of the project's operation for the sole purpose of maintaining such minimum stream flows, the permittee shall let the flow provided by the augmentation project pass his or her point of withdrawal. When specifying those permittees subject to such notification, the director shall also establish, in accordance with the factors that may be considered under paragraph (e) of this Code section, those permittees that shall not be subject to the requirements of this Code section.

Such notification shall be provided in accordance with rules promulgated by the board, shall be based on the best available science, and shall, at a minimum, inform the permittees that the upstream project is delivering augmented flows for the sole purpose of maintaining the minimum stream flows sufficient to protect habitat critical for vulnerable aquatic life within the affected areas.

The director's notification shall contain notice of opportunity for a hearing and shall be served by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the most recent address provided by the permittee. Any permittee to whom such notification is directed shall comply therewith immediately, but shall be afforded a hearing within five business days of the director's receipt of a petition filed by such permittee. Such hearing shall be before an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings and shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2. Based upon findings adduced at such hearing, the notification shall be modified, reversed, or continued by the director.

In preparing such notification, the director may consider:

The best available modeling and monitoring data for relevant locations and stream reaches;

The appropriate duration of protection of augmented flows;

The distance downstream for which protection of augmented flows is appropriate;

The degree to which protection of augmented flows will assist in mitigating the effects of droughts, provide ecological or other environmental benefits, and ensure sustainable, long-term access to water resources for existing and future water users; and

Any other data or information the director deems relevant.

Nothing in this Code section shall provide authority for the interbasin transfer of any water.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-546.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 5/SB 213; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 12/HB 90.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).

12-5-547. Director's orders.

If the director determines that the total number of nonirrigated acres needed during a given year cannot be sufficiently obtained through the irrigation reduction auction held in accordance with Code Section 12-5-546, the director is authorized to issue an order, in accordance with rules adopted by the board, requiring certain permittees not to irrigate a specified number of acres of irrigated land until the end of the calendar year. When issuing such orders, the director shall begin with the permittees whose withdrawal permits were issued most recently and then work chronologically backward with each order issued. A permittee who is issued such an order shall be compensated for such restriction if such permittee applied to the division for a surface-water or ground-water withdrawal permit prior to December 1, 1999, received a surface-water or ground-water withdrawal permit from the division prior to December 1, 2000, and is able to demonstrate actual previous irrigation on the same acres of land which the owner has been ordered not to irrigate. The per acre dollar amount received by a permittee pursuant to this Code section shall be equal to the average agreed upon sum per acre paid pursuant to the irrigation reduction auction during the same year.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-547

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-548. Investigations and inspections.

The division shall have the right, in accordance with rules adopted by the board, to conduct such investigations and inspections as may reasonably be necessary to carry out its duties prescribed in this article and to ensure compliance with this article, the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this article, and any agreement or order that the division or director enters into or issues pursuant to this article. For these purposes, the division shall have the right to enter at reasonable times any property, public or private, and conduct such investigations or inspections.

No person shall refuse entry or access to any authorized representative of the division who requests entry for the purposes of a lawful inspection and who presents appropriate credentials, nor shall any person obstruct, hamper, or interfere with any such representative while in the process of carrying out his or her official duties consistent with the provisions of this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-548

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1.)

12-5-549. Compliance; violations.

Except as may otherwise be provided in this article, whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this article or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article has occurred, he or she shall attempt to obtain compliance therewith by conference, conciliation, or persuasion, if the making of such an attempt is appropriate under the circumstances. If he or she fails to obtain compliance in this manner, the director may order the violator to take whatever corrective action the director deems necessary in order to obtain such compliance within a period of time to be prescribed in such order.

Except as may otherwise be provided in this article, any order issued by the director under this article shall become final unless the person or persons named therein file with the director a written request for a hearing within 30 days after such order or permit is served on such person or persons.

Except as may otherwise be provided in this article, hearings on contested matters and judicial review of final orders and other enforcement actions under this article shall be provided and conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

The director may file in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides, or if the person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, a certified copy of a final order of the director unappealed from or a final order of the director affirmed upon appeal, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

For purposes of this Code section, a violation of an agreement entered into in accordance with Code Section

12-5-546

or an order issued by the director in accordance with Code Section

12-5-547

shall be prima facie established upon a showing that:

During the effective period of the agreement or order, the irrigation system was observed in person or via remote sensing or otherwise established by representatives of the division or others to have been operating and disbursing water; or

During the effective period of the agreement or order, a seal, lock, or other device placed by the division on the system to prevent operation of the system has been broken or otherwise tampered with.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-549

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 302, § 6/SB 213.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 9 (2014).

12-5-550. Repayment penalty; notice of violation; time limit to respond to notice of violation; failure to respond to notice of violation.

A repayment penalty in the amount of three times the dollar amount of payments received from the drought protection funds shall be paid by any person who irrigates in violation of an agreement entered into in accordance with Code Section 12-5-546 or in violation of an order issued by the director in accordance with Code Section 12-5-547. Such penalties shall be assessed on a per violation basis. A violation shall be deemed to have occurred each time a person irrigates in violation of an agreement or order.

Within 30 days after discovery that a permittee violated an agreement entered into pursuant to Code Section 12-5-546 or an order issued by the director in accordance with Code Section 12-5-547, the director shall send via certified mail or statutory overnight delivery a notice of violation to the permittee stating:

The date on which the violation occurred;

The facts constituting the violation and a statement that such facts will be deemed admitted unless denied by petition for hearing; and

The total dollar amount of repayment penalties owed by the permittee, together with a demand that said amount be paid in full within 30 days of the permittee's receipt of the notice.

A permittee receiving a notice of violation pursuant to this Code section shall have 30 days from receipt thereof either to pay in full the total amount of repayment penalties set forth in the notice or to submit a petition challenging such notice to the director. If a petition is filed within the required time, then a hearing shall be conducted with respect to same in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," and the rules and regulations applicable thereto.

If a permittee receiving a notice of violation pursuant to this Code section does not either pay the total amount of repayment penalties or submit a petition challenging the notice, then the facts set out in the notice shall be deemed admitted and the director shall issue an order to the permittee, assessing the total repayment penalties due from the permittee as set forth in the notice of violation and requiring payment of same within 30 days of issuance of the order. Any order issued by the director pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed final, and no hearing or appeal may be taken.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-550

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1212, § 3.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2001, p. 1212,

§

7, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2001.